Hawaii, session 2026, HB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that fireworks-related offenses occur all too often within the State, and often cause devastating physical harm to residents. The legislature particularly notes the recent mass casualty incident in Aliamanu on December 31, 2024, in which fireworks killed at least four people and injured dozens more.  The legislature believes that the State must take action to deter the illegal use of fireworks. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the class A felony-level offense of serious bodily injury or death resulting from fireworks. SECTION 2.  Chapter 132D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§132D- Serious bodily injury or death resulting from fireworks.  (a)  Any person who causes serious bodily injury to another, or causes the death of another, as a result of the person's actions as described in section 132D-14(a)(2), shall be guilty of a class A felony. (b)  This section shall not be construed to preclude the imposition of any other penalty imposed by this chapter." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________